Illinois, session 104th, HB2167.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The College Planning Act is amended by changing 5Section 1 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 17/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8College Planning Act.9(Source: P.A. 97-289, eff. 8-10-11.)